Utah statutes.
75-5-315.   Copies of public records furnished to veterans administration.
When a copy of any public record is required by the veterans administration to
be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in
benefits made available by the veterans administration, the official custodian
of such public record shall without charge provide the applicant for such
benefits or any person acting on behalf of the authorized representative of
the veterans administration with a certified copy of such record.
